Massachusetts, session 194th, S1738.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Subsection (a) of section 178E of chapter 6 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the words “data to
the”, in line 17, the following words:- “state police and”.
SECTION 2. Section 178H of said chapter 6, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting the following subsection:-
“(c) Whenever the board determines that an offender knowingly and intentionally: (i)
fails to register; (ii) fails to verify registration information; (iii) fails to provide notice of a
change of address; or (iv) knowingly provides false information; the board shall transmit relevant
data to the state police who shall seek an arrest warrant for the offender.”
of 2

SECTION 3. Section 178K of said chapter 6, as so appearing, by inserting after the words
“section 178L”, in line 48, the following sentence:- “These agreements shall include a
memorandum of understanding with the state police for the purpose of locating any offender who
fails to complete registration requirements or any offender the board cannot classify due to an
inability to meet notification standards.”
of 2